Washington statutes.
RCW 27.12.215

Job recruitment expenditures authorized.

The trustees of a library or a library district have the authority to spend funds to recruit job candidates. The trustees have the authority to reimburse job candidates for reasonable and necessary travel expenses including transportation, subsistence, and lodging.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 40 s 1.]